apertium-tr-tt.tt.lexc
LEXICON PREDLEX-I

%<pred%>%<ger5%>:%>кән POSS ;
%<pred%>%<ifi%>:%>де V-PERS-S2 ;        


LEXICON QSTLEX

%<qst%>: # ; 

LEXICON ABBR 

%<abbr%>: # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Conjunctions

вә:вә CCLEX ; ! ""
һәм:һәм CCLEX ; ! ""
ә:ә CCLEX ; ! ""
әмма:әмма CCLEX ; ! ""

да:да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
да:да CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:та CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:дә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
да:тә CCLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR

шуңа% күрә:шуңа% күрә CALEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Postpositions 

белән:белән POSTLEX ; ! ""
инде:инде POSTLEX ; ! ""
өчен:өчен POSTLEX ; ! ""
аркылы:аркылы POSTLEX ; ! ""
аша:аша POSTLEX ; ! ""
кирәк:кирәк POSTLEX ; ! ""
каршы:каршы POSTLEX ; ! ""
башка:башка POSTLEX ; ! ""
карамастан:карамастан POSTLEX ; ! ""
астында:астында POSTLEX ; ! ""         !! this is actually a noun

буенча:буенча POSTLEX ; ! ""
кебек:кебек POSTLEX ; ! ""
карамагында:карамагында POSTLEX ; ! ""
тапкыр:тапкыр POSTLEX ; ! ""
тикле:тикле POSTLEX ; ! ""
хакында:хакында POSTLEX ; ! ""
саен:саен POSTLEX ; ! ""
астына:астына POSTLEX ; ! ""
буйлап:буйлап POSTLEX ; ! ""
буларак:буларак POSTLEX ; ! ""


LEXICON Postadverbs

гына:%~гына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/RL
гына:гына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:генә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кына POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR
гына:кенә POSTADVLEX ; ! "" Dir/LR


LEXICON Pronouns

PRNLEX-PERS ; 

ни:ни PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
нәрсә:нәрсә PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
нимә:нимә PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
кем:кем PRNITGLEX ; ! ""
һичбер:һичбер PRNITGLEX ; ! ""

бу: PRNDEM-BU ; ! ""
шул: PRNDEM-ŠUL ; ! ""
шушы:шушы PRNDEMLEX ; ! ""     !FIXME: these share the same endings with "бу", see мо-ңа <> шушы-ңа
теге:теге PRNDEMLEX ; ! ""     !теге-ңә (exceptional case endings in singular)
                                !TODO:maybe it is possible to link all PRNDEMs to one Continuation class?

үз:үз PRNREFLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Determiners


бу:бу DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
шушы:шушы DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
шул:шул DETDEMLEX ; ! ""
теге:теге DETDEMLEX ; ! ""

бөтен:бөтен DETQNTLEX ; ! ""
бар:бар DETQNTLEX ; ! ""
барлык:барлык DETQNTLEX ; ! ""

бер:бер DETINDLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Numerals 

бер:бер NUMLEX ; ! ""
ике:ике NUMLEX ; ! ""
өч:өч NUMLEX ; ! ""
дүрт:дүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
биш:биш NUMLEX ; ! ""
алты:алты NUMLEX ; ! ""
җиде:җиде NUMLEX ; ! ""
сигез:сигез NUMLEX ; ! ""
тугыз:тугыз NUMLEX ; ! ""
ун:ун NUMLEX ; ! ""

унбер:унбер NUMLEX ; ! ""
унике:унике NUMLEX ; ! ""
унөч:унөч NUMLEX ; ! ""
ундүрт:ундүрт NUMLEX ; ! ""
унбиш:унбиш NUMLEX ; ! ""
уналты:уналты NUMLEX ; ! ""
унҗиде:унҗиде NUMLEX ; ! ""
унсигез:унсигез NUMLEX ; ! ""
унтугыз:унтугыз NUMLEX ; ! ""

егерме:егерме NUMLEX ; ! ""
утыз:утыз NUMLEX ; ! ""
кырык:кырык NUMLEX ; ! ""
илле:илле NUMLEX ; ! ""
алтмыш:алтмыш NUMLEX ; ! ""
җитмеш:җитмеш NUMLEX ; ! ""
сиксән:сиксән NUMLEX ; ! ""
туксан:туксан NUMLEX ; ! ""
йөз:йөз NUMLEX ; ! ""

мең:мең NUMLEX ; ! ""
төмән:төмән NUMLEX ; ! "archaic for 10 000"
түмән:түмән NUMLEX ; ! "archaic for 10 000"
миллион:миллион NUMLEX ; ! ""
миллиард:миллиард NUMLEX ; ! ""

LEXICON Abbreviations

км:км ABBR ; 
км²:км² ABBR ; 
км³:км³ ABBR ; 

LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
..%<sent%>:.. # ;
...%<sent%>:... # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ;
%—%<guio%>:%— # ;
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ; 
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;
%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
\%<sent%>:\ # ;
/%<sent%>:/ # ;

<(%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9)+>  DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON Adverbs 
мы:мы QSTLEX ; ! ""
ме:ме QSTLEX ; ! ""
LEXICON Verbs
и:и PREDLEX-I ; ! ""
